Washington statutes.
RCW 41.35.610

Choice of membership in plan 2 or plan 3.

(1) All classified employees who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2007, shall have a period of ninety days to make an irrevocable choice to become a member of plan 2 or plan 3. At the end of ninety days, if the member has not made a choice to become a member of plan 2, he or she becomes a member of plan 3 or plan 2 as follows:

(a) Becomes a member of plan 3 if first employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2007, but prior to July 1, 2020;

(b) Becomes a member of plan 2 if first employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2020.

(2) For administrative efficiency, until a member elects to become a member of plan 3, or becomes a member of plan 3 by default under subsection (1) of this section, the member shall be reported to the department in plan 2, with member and employer contributions. Upon becoming a member of plan 3 by election or by default, all service credit shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined benefit, and all employee accumulated contributions shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined contribution account.

[ 2019 c 313 s 2; 2007 c 491 s 7; 1998 c 341 s 202.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2007 c 491 ss 1, 3, and 7: See note following RCW 41.32.835.

Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—2007 c 491: See notes following RCW 41.32.765.